Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 3. Boating Safety.

§ 29.1-734.
Authorization for and placing of markers in waters of the Commonwealth used for public swimming areas; no motorboating, waterskiing in marked area.

Any owner of real estate which touches any of the waters of this Commonwealth or the agent of the owner may petition the Board to authorize the placing of markers approved by the Board around a public swimming or bathing area.

The Department, upon receiving the petition and sufficient proof that the water adjacent to the real estate is used in whole or in part as a public swimming or bathing area, may authorize the placement of the markers to designate the area as a swimming or bathing area.

The cost of the purchase and placement of the markers shall be borne by the party requesting the placement of the markers.

No person shall operate a motorboat or manipulate skis within the area of the waters of the Commonwealth marked under this section. Persons violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor.

History.

1964, c. 654, § 62-174.5:1; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-171; 1983, c. 475; 1987, c. 488.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 4 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to penalty for maiming of another resulting from operating a watercraft while intoxicated, see §

18.2-51.5

.

§ 29.1-734.1.
Skin and scuba divers.

No person shall engage in skin diving or scuba diving from a boat in the waters of this Commonwealth which are open to boating, or assist in such diving, without displaying a diver’s flag from a mast, buoy, or other structure at the place of diving; and no person shall display such flag except when diving operations are under way or in preparation or display a diver’s flag in a location which will unreasonably obstruct vessels from making legitimate navigational use of the water.

The diver’s flag shall be square, not less than twelve inches on a side, and shall be of red background with a diagonal white stripe, of a width equal to one fifth of the flag’s height, running from the upper corner adjacent to the mast downward to the opposite outside corner.

No operator of a vessel under way in the waters of this Commonwealth shall permit such vessel to approach closer than twenty-five yards to any structure from which a diver’s flag is then being displayed.

History.

1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-735.
Regulations for vessel operation and equipment.

The Board shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate: (i) to provide rules for the safe and reasonable operation of vessels so as to reduce the risks of collision, personal injury and property damage as a result of such operation; and (ii) to govern the number, type, condition, performance capabilities, use, and stowage on board, of lifesaving (personal flotation) devices and other safety equipment to be carried on vessels or classes of vessels operated on waters within the territorial limits of this Commonwealth.

The Board is hereby authorized to make regulations to the extent necessary to keep these requirements generally in conformity with the provisions of the federal navigation laws, or with the rules promulgated by the United States Coast Guard or the United States Secretary of Transportation.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a vessel which is not equipped as required by Board regulations.

History.

1984, c. 417, § 62.1-172.1; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-735.1.
Board authorized to promulgate regulations for seaplanes.

The Board may promulgate regulations governing the takeoff, landing and taxi of seaplanes on impoundments located in the inland waters of the Commonwealth, so as to reduce the risks of collision, personal injury and property damage as a result of such operation. Such regulations shall not be inconsistent with regulations of the Federal Aviation Administration. Conservation police officers shall report any alleged violations of federal or state regulations regarding the operation of seaplanes or aircraft to the appropriate federal authorities responsible for regulating the operation of seaplanes and aircraft.

History.

1994, c. 414.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “Conservation police officers” was substituted for “Game wardens” to conform to the name change by Acts 2007, c. 87.

§ 29.1-735.2.
Boating safety education required; Board to promulgate regulations.

No person shall operate a motorboat with a motor of 10 horsepower or greater or personal watercraft on the public waters of the Commonwealth, unless the operator has met the requirements for boating safety education in accordance with the age provisions established in subsection D.

A person shall be considered in compliance with the requirements for boating safety education if the person meets one of the following:

Completes and passes a boating safety course approved by the National Association of State Boating Law Administrators (NASBLA) and accepted by the Department;

Passes a proctored equivalency examination that tests the knowledge of information included in the curriculum of an approved course;

Possesses a valid license to operate a vessel issued to maritime personnel by the United States Coast Guard or a marine certificate issued by the Canadian government;

Possesses a state-approved nonrenewable temporary operator’s certificate to operate a motorboat for 90 days that was issued with the certificate of number for the motorboat, if the boat is new or was sold with a transfer of ownership;

Possesses a rental or lease agreement from a motorboat rental or leasing business, which lists the person as the authorized operator of the motorboat;

Operates the motorboat under onboard direct supervision of a person who meets the requirements of this section;

Demonstrates that he is not a resident, is temporarily using the waters of Virginia for a period not to exceed 90 days, and meets any applicable boating safety education requirements of the state of residency, or possesses a Canadian Pleasure Craft Operator’s Card;

Has assumed operation of the motorboat due to the illness or physical impairment of the initial operator, and is returning the motorboat to shore in order to provide assistance or care for the operator;

Is registered as a commercial fisherman pursuant to §

28.2-241

or a person who is under the onboard direct supervision of the commercial fisherman while operating the commercial fisherman’s boat;

Provides documentation that he is serving or has qualified as a surface warfare officer or enlisted surface warfare specialist in the United States Navy; or

Provides documentation that he is serving or has qualified as an Officer of the Deck Underway, boat coxswain, boat officer, boat operator, watercraft operator, or Marine Deck Officer in any branch of the Armed Forces of the United States, United States Coast Guard, or Merchant Marine.

The Board shall promulgate regulations by July 1, 2008, to implement a boating safety education program for all motorboat and personal watercraft operators to meet boating safety education requirements.

Such regulations shall include provisions that phase-in the requirements for boating safety education according to the following:

Personal watercraft operators 20 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2009;

Personal watercraft operators 35 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2010;

Personal watercraft operators 50 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2011;

All personal watercraft operators, regardless of age, to meet the requirements by July 1, 2012;

Motorboat operators 20 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2011;

Motorboat operators 30 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2012;

Motorboat operators 40 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2013;

Motorboat operators 45 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2014;

Motorboat operators 50 years of age or younger to meet the requirements by July 1, 2015; and

All motorboat operators, regardless of age, to meet the requirements by July 1, 2016.

Such regulations may include, but not be limited to, provisions for compliance, statewide availability of NASBLA-approved courses including through the Internet, the issuance of certificates to document successful course completion, duplicate certificates, recordkeeping, requirements for course providers, instructor certification, student name and address changes, equivalency exam criteria, provisions for an open-book test for classroom based courses, requirements for motorboat rental and leasing businesses, issuance of a temporary operator’s certificate, and the establishment of fees (not to exceed the cost of giving such instruction for each person participating in and receiving the instruction) for boating safety courses and certificates.

The Board shall consult and coordinate with the boating public, professional organizations for recreational boating safety, and the boating retail, leasing, and dealer business community in the promulgation of such regulations.

The Department shall, by July 1, 2018, establish and thereafter shall maintain a database listing every person who, at any time prior to that date, has completed and passed a boating safety course pursuant to subdivision B 1. The database shall list each person’s full name and date of birth and the date on which he passed the safety course, and it shall allow any person who completes and passes the course after July 1, 2018, to add his own information. The Department shall make the database available to law-enforcement officers and, to the extent possible or appropriate, shall maintain the confidentiality of information in the database.

Any person who operates a motorboat on the waters of the Commonwealth shall, upon the request of a law-enforcement officer, present to the officer evidence in physical or electronic form that he has complied with subsection B. The law-enforcement officer shall not issue a citation until he has checked the boating safety course passage database created pursuant to subsection G. The listing of the operator in such database shall constitute satisfactory evidence that he has complied with subsection B.

Any person who violates any provision of this section or any regulation promulgated hereunder shall be subject to a civil penalty of $100. All civil penalties assessed under this section shall be deposited in the Motorboat and Water Safety Fund of the Game Protection Fund and used as provided for in §

29.1-701

.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to law-enforcement officers while they are engaged in the performance of their official duties.

History.

2007, cc. 615, 732; 2013, c. 48; 2015, c. 160; 2017, c. 360.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2007, cc. 615 and 732, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Game and Inland Fisheries shall submit the proposed and final regulations authorized under the provisions of this act to the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources at the same time such regulations are submitted to the Virginia Register, so that the Committees may exercise their oversight responsibilities pursuant to §

2.2-4014

of the Code of Virginia.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 48 added subdivision B 10 and made related changes.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 160 added subdivision B 11 and made related changes.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 360 added subsection G and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection H, inserted “in physical or electronic form” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

§ 29.1-735.3.
Regulation of parasail operators.

The Board shall promulgate regulations applicable to the commercial operations of parasail operators on waters of the Commonwealth. Such regulations shall take into consideration the operating standards and guidelines of the Professional Association of Parasail Operators.

History.

2007, c. 625; 2020, c. 958.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 2007 act having assigned none.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958 deleted “of Game and Inland Fisheries” following “Board” in the first sentence.

§ 29.1-736.
Boat rentals; equipment; safety course.

It shall be unlawful to rent a motorboat to any person unless the provisions of this chapter have been complied with. It shall be the duty of persons renting motorboats to equip them as required by this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to regularly offer a boat or boats, other than a motorboat, for rent for use on the public waters of the Commonwealth unless such person provides, for the use of each passenger in the boat, a life preserver of the sort prescribed by the regulations of the Board.

It shall be unlawful for any person, without first successfully completing a basic boating safety education course approved by the Director, to rent a personal watercraft to another person.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.8; 1962, c. 626; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-174; 1987, c. 488; 1998, c. 515.

§ 29.1-737.
Muffling devices.

The exhaust of every internal combustion engine used on any motorboat shall be effectively muffled by equipment so constructed and used as to muffle the noise of the exhaust in a reasonable manner. The muffling device shall exhaust at or below the water line or it shall be equipped with mechanical baffles. The use of cutouts is prohibited, except as approved by the Department or the U.S. Coast Guard.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.9; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-175; 1987, c. 488; 1997, c. 108.

§ 29.1-738.
Operating boat or manipulating water skis, etc., in reckless manner or while intoxicated, etc.

No person shall operate any motorboat or vessel, or manipulate any skis, surfboard, or similar device, or engage in any spearfishing while skin diving or scuba diving in a reckless manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person.

No person shall operate any watercraft, as defined in §

29.1-733.2

, or motorboat which is underway (i) while such person has a blood alcohol concentration at or greater than the blood alcohol concentration at which it is unlawful to drive or operate a motor vehicle as provided in §

18.2-266

as indicated by a chemical test administered in accordance with §

29.1-738.2

, (ii) while such person is under the influence of alcohol, (iii) while such person is under the influence of any narcotic drug or any other self-administered intoxicant or drug of whatsoever nature, or any combination of such drugs, to a degree which impairs his ability to operate the watercraft or motorboat safely, (iv) while such person is under the combined influence of alcohol and any drug or drugs to a degree which impairs his ability to operate the watercraft or motorboat safely, or (v) while such person has a blood concentration of any of the following substances at a level that is equal to or greater than (a) 0.02 milligrams of cocaine per liter of blood, (b) 0.1 milligrams of methamphetamine per liter of blood, (c) 0.01 milligrams of phencyclidine per liter of blood, or (d) 0.1 milligrams of 3,4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine per liter of blood.

For purposes of this article, the word “operate” includes being in actual physical control of a watercraft or motorboat and “underway” means that a vessel is not at anchor, or made fast to the shore, or aground.Any person who violates any provision of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.10; 1962, c. 626; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-176; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 176; 1989, c. 726; 1994, c. 587; 1996, cc. 929, 1015; 1997, c. 703; 2005, c. 616; 2013, c. 787.

Cross references.

For authorization for locality to provide by ordinance for reimbursement of certain expenses incurred in responding to DUI and other traffic incidents related to violation of §

29.1-738

, see §

15.2-1716

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to penalties for involuntary manslaughter as a result of operating a watercraft while under the influence, see §

18.2-36.2

. As to penalty for maiming of another resulting from operation of a watercraft while intoxicated, see §

18.2-51.5

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 616, in subsection B, inserted clause (v) and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 787, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “§ 29.733.2” for “§

29.1-712

” near the beginning of subsection B; and in subsection C, substituted “includes” for “shall include” and “means” for “shall mean” in the first paragraph, and “is guilty” for “shall be guilty” in the second paragraph.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2807 Certificate of Refusal — Breath/Blood Test (Watercraft or Motorboats); No. 9-2817 Entry into Alcohol Rehabilitation Program (Boat).

§ 29.1-738.01.
Operating boat in an improper manner; penalty.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

29.1-738

, upon the trial of any person charged with reckless boating where the degree of culpability is slight, the court in its discretion may find the accused not guilty of reckless boating but guilty of improper boating.
Improper boating shall be punishable as a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1991, c. 404.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-738.02.
Persons under age twenty-one operating watercraft after illegally consuming alcohol; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person under the age of twenty-one to operate any watercraft or motorboat upon the waters of the Commonwealth after consuming alcohol. Any such person with a blood alcohol concentration of 0.02 percent or more by weight by volume or 0.02 grams or more per 210 liters of breath but less than 0.08 by weight by volume or less than 0.08 grams per 210 liters of breath as indicated by a chemical test administered as provided in Article 2 (§

18.2-266

et seq.) of Chapter 7 of Title 18.2 shall be in violation of this section.

A violation of this section shall be punishable by denial by the court of such person’s privilege to operate a watercraft or motorboat for a period of six months from the date of conviction and by a fine of not more than $500. Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be eligible to attend an Alcohol Safety Action Program under the provisions of §

29.1-738.5

.

History.

1996, c. 631.

Cross references.

For authorization for locality to provide by ordinance for reimbursement of certain expenses incurred in responding to DUI and other traffic incidents related to violation of §

29.1-738.02

, see §

15.2-1716

. As to maintenance of records of convictions for violations of this section by the Department of Motor Vehicles, see §

46.2-208

. As to requirement that every general district court or circuit court keep a full record of every case in which a person is charged with a violation of this section, see §

46.2-382

.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2817 Entry into Alcohol Rehabilitation Program (Boat).

§ 29.1-738.03.
Reckless operation of a personal watercraft.

A person shall be guilty of reckless operation of a motorboat or vessel who operates any personal watercraft recklessly or at a speed or in such a manner so as to endanger the life, limb or property of any person, which shall include, but not be limited to:

Weaving through vessels which are underway, stopped, moored or at anchor while exceeding a reasonable speed under the circumstances and traffic conditions existing at the time;

Following another vessel or person on water skis or other similar device, crossing the path of another vessel, or jumping the wake of another vessel more closely than is reasonable and prudent, having due regard to the speed of both vessels and the traffic on and the condition of the waters at the time;

Crossing between the towing vessel and a person on water skis or other device; or

Steering toward an object or person and turning sharply in close proximity to such object or person in order to spray or attempt to spray the object or person with the wash or jet spray of the personal watercraft.A person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and for a second or subsequent offense, the court shall order the person not to operate a personal watercraft which is underway upon the waters of the Commonwealth for a period of twelve months.

History.

1998, c. 514.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 29.1-738.1.
Analysis of breath to determine alcohol content of blood.

Any person who is suspected of a violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

or §

29.1-738.02

shall be entitled, if such equipment is available, to have a preliminary breath analysis for the purpose of obtaining an analysis of the probable alcohol content of his blood. The procedures and requirements of §

18.2-267

shall apply, mutatis mutandis.

History.

1989, c. 726; 1996, c. 631.

§ 29.1-738.2.
Consent to blood or breath test.

Any person who operates a watercraft or motorboat which is underway upon waters of the Commonwealth shall be deemed thereby, as a condition of such operation, to have consented to have samples of his blood, breath, or both blood and breath taken for a chemical test to determine the alcohol, drug, or both alcohol and drug content of his blood, if such person is arrested for operating a watercraft or motorboat which is underway in violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, §

29.1-738.02

, or of a similar ordinance of any county, city or town, within three hours of the alleged offense. Any person so arrested for a violation of clause (i) or (ii), or both, of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, §

29.1-738.02

, or of a similar ordinance, shall submit to a breath test. If the breath test is not available, or the person is physically unable to submit to the breath test, a blood test shall be given. The accused shall, prior to administration of the test, be advised by the person administering the test that he has the right to observe the process of analysis and to see the blood-alcohol reading on the equipment used to perform the breath test. If such equipment automatically produces a written printout of the breath test result, this written printout, or a copy thereof, shall be given to the accused in each case.

Any person, after having been arrested for a violation of clause (iii), (iv), or (v) of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, §

29.1-738.02

, or of a similar ordinance, may be required to submit to a blood test to determine the drug or both drug and alcohol content of his blood. When a person, after having been arrested for a violation of clause (i) or (ii), or both, of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, submits to a breath test, in accordance with subsection A of this section, or refuses to take or is incapable of taking such a breath test, he may be required to submit to tests to determine the drug or both drug and alcohol content of his blood if the law-enforcement officer has reasonable cause to believe the person was operating a watercraft or motorboat under the influence of any drug or combination of drugs, or the combined influence of alcohol and drugs.

If a person, after being arrested for a violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, §

29.1-738.02

, or of a similar ordinance of any county, city or town and after having been advised by the arresting officer that a person who operates a watercraft or motorboat which is underway upon the waters of the Commonwealth shall be deemed thereby, as a condition of such operation, to have consented to have a sample of his blood and breath taken for a chemical test to determine the alcohol or drug content of his blood, and that the unreasonable refusal to do so constitutes grounds for a court to order him not to operate a watercraft or motorboat which is underway upon the waters of the Commonwealth, then refuses to permit the taking of a sample of his blood or breath or both blood and breath samples for such tests, the arresting officer shall take the person arrested before a committing magistrate. If the person is unable to be taken before a magistrate because the person is taken to a medical facility for treatment or evaluation of his medical condition, the arresting officer at a medical facility, in the presence of a witness other than a law-enforcement officer, shall again advise the person, at the medical facility, of the law requiring blood or breath samples to be taken and the penalty for refusal. If he again so refuses after having been further advised by such magistrate or by the arresting officer at a medical facility of the law requiring a blood or breath sample to be taken and the penalty for refusal, and so declares again his refusal in writing upon a form provided by the Supreme Court of Virginia, or refuses or fails to so declare in writing and such fact is certified as prescribed in §

18.2-268.3

, then no blood or breath sample shall be taken even though he may thereafter request same.

When any person is arrested for operating a watercraft or motorboat which is underway in violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

or §

29.1-738.02

, the procedures and requirements of §§

18.2-268.1

through

18.2-268.11

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to this section.

If the court or jury finds the defendant guilty of unreasonably refusing to permit a blood or breath sample to be taken, the court shall order such person not to operate a watercraft or motorboat which is underway for a period of 12 months for a first offense and for 24 months for a second or subsequent offense of refusal within five years of the first or other such refusal. However, if the defendant pleads guilty to a violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, the court may dismiss the refusal warrant.

History.

1989, c. 726; 1990, cc. 825, 929; 1992, c. 830; 1995, c. 130; 1996, c. 631; 2001, c. 779; 2005, c. 616; 2007, c. 168.

Cross references.

As to maintenance of records of convictions for violations of this section by the Department of Motor Vehicles, see §

46.2-208

. As to requirement that every general district court or circuit court keep a full record of every case in which a person is charged with a violation of this section, see §

46.2-382

.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 779 in subsection C, inserted the present second sentence, and inserted “or by the arresting officer at a medical facility” following “magistrate” in the present third sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 616, in the first sentence of subsection B, inserted “or (v)” and made a related change; and made minor stylistic changes in subsection E.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 168 substituted “within three hours” for “within two hours” near the end of the first sentence in subsection A.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2805 Certificate of Refusal—Breath Test; No. 9-2806 Declaration and Acknowledgment of Refusal — Breath/Blood Test (Motor Vehicles Generally); No. 9-2807 Certificate of Refusal — Breath/Blood Test (Watercraft or Motorboats).

§ 29.1-738.3.
Presumptions from alcohol or drug content.

In any prosecution for operating a watercraft or motorboat that is underway in violation of clause (ii), (iii), or (iv) of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, or of a similar ordinance of any county, city or town, the amount of alcohol or drugs in the blood of the accused at the time of the alleged offense as indicated by a chemical analysis of a sample of the accused’s blood or breath to determine the alcohol or drug content of his blood (i) in accordance with the provisions of §

29.1-738.2

or (ii) performed by the Department of Forensic Science in accordance with the provisions of §§

18.2-268.5

,

18.2-268.6

, and

18.2-268.7

on the suspect’s whole blood drawn pursuant to a search warrant shall give rise to the rebuttable presumptions of subdivisions A 1 through 4 of §

18.2-269

.

History.

1989, c. 726; 1995, c. 130; 2005, c. 616; 2017, c. 623.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 616 inserted “(iii)” preceding “or (iv),” “or drugs” preceding “in the blood,” “or drug” preceding “content of his blood,” and substituted “alcohol” for “alcoholic” and “(4)” for “(3).”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 623, effective March 16, 2017, inserted “or (ii) performed by the Department of Forensic Science in accordance with the provisions of §§

18.2-268.5

,

18.2-268.6

, and

18.2-268.7

on the suspect’s whole blood drawn pursuant to a search warrant,” substituted “subdivisions A 1 through 4 of §

18.2-269

” for “subdivisions (1) through (4) of subsection A of §

18.2-269

” and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-738.4.
Additional penalty for reckless or intoxicated operation of a watercraft or motorboat.

In addition to any other penalties authorized by law, upon conviction of any person for violation of any provision of §

29.1-738

, the court shall order such person not to operate a watercraft or motorboat which is underway upon the waters of the Commonwealth for a period of twelve months from the date of a first conviction or for a period of three years from the date of a second or subsequent conviction within ten years of a first conviction. The period specified in any such order prohibiting operation of a watercraft or motorboat which is underway imposed pursuant to this section shall run consecutively with any such order imposed for refusal to permit a blood or breath sample to be taken.

A first offense of violating this section shall constitute a Class 2 misdemeanor. A second or subsequent offense shall constitute a Class 1 misdemeanor. In addition, the court shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a motorboat or watercraft for the same period for which it had been suspended or revoked when such person violated this section.

The period specified in any such order prohibiting operation of a watercraft or motorboat which is underway imposed pursuant to this section may be suspended by the court only as authorized in §

29.1-738.5

.

History.

1989, c. 726; 1996, cc. 929, 1015.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and Class 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

. As to arrest without warrant, see §

19.2-81

. As to maintenance of records of convictions for violations of this section by the Department of Motor Vehicles, see §

46.2-208

. As to requirement that every general district court or circuit court keep a full record of every case in which a person is charged with a violation of this section, see §

46.2-382

.

§ 29.1-738.5.
Participation in rehabilitation program.

Any person convicted of a violation of subsection B of §

29.1-738

, or any ordinance of a county, city or town similar to the provisions thereof, or any second offense thereunder, shall, with leave of court or upon court order, enter into an alcohol safety action program certified by the Commission on the Virginia Alcohol Safety Action Program (VASAP) in the judicial district in which the charge is brought or in any other judicial district upon such terms and conditions as the court may set forth. In the determination of the eligibility of such person to enter a program, the court shall consider his prior record of participation in any other rehabilitation program. Suspension of the penalties imposed pursuant to §

29.1-738.4

shall be conditioned upon successful completion of such a program.

The court shall require the person entering such program under the provisions of subsection A to pay a fee of no less than $250 but no more than $300. A reasonable portion of such fee, as may be determined by the Commission on VASAP, but not to exceed ten percent, shall be forwarded quarterly to be deposited with the State Treasurer for expenditure by the Commission on VASAP, and the balance shall be held in a separate fund for local administration of alcohol rehabilitation programs. Upon a finding that the defendant is indigent, the court may reduce or waive the fee. In addition to the costs of the proceeding, fees as may reasonably be required of defendants referred for extended treatment under such program may be charged.

Upon such conviction, the court shall impose the sentence authorized. Upon a finding that a person so convicted is eligible for participation in an alcohol rehabilitation program, the court shall enter the conviction on the warrant, and shall note that the person so convicted has been referred to a program. If the court finds that a person is not eligible for a program or subsequently that the person has violated, without good cause, any of the conditions set forth by the court in entering the program, the court shall dispose of the case as if no program had been entered. Appeals from any such disposition shall be allowed as provided by law.The court shall have jurisdiction over any person entering a program under the provisions of this section until such time as the case has been disposed of by either successful completion of the program, or final imposition of sentence upon ineligibility or violation of a condition imposed by the court, whichever occurs first.

The Commission on VASAP shall establish standards and criteria for the implementation and operation of water safety alcohol rehabilitation programs. The Commission on VASAP shall also establish criteria for the modalities of administration of such programs, as well as public information, accounting procedures and allocation of funds.

History.

1989, c. 726.

Cross references.

As to penalties for involuntary manslaughter as a result of operating a watercraft while under the influence, see §

18.2-36.2

. As to penalty for maiming of another resulting from operating a watercraft while intoxicated, see §

18.2-51.5

.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-2817 Entry into Alcohol Rehabilitation Program (Boat).

§ 29.1-738.6.
When arrested person operating a vessel; how vessel removed from scene of arrest.

In any case in which a law-enforcement officer arrests the operator of a vessel, and there is no legal cause for the retention of the vessel by the officer, the officer shall allow the person arrested to designate another person who is present at the scene of the arrest to operate the vessel from the scene to a place designated by the person arrested. If such a designation is not made, the officer may cause the vessel to be taken to the nearest appropriate place for safekeeping.

History.

1997, c. 152.

§ 29.1-739.
Duty of operator involved in collision, accident or other casualty; immunity from liability; report of collision, etc.; summons in lieu of arrest.

It shall be the duty of the operator of a vessel involved in a collision, accident, or other casualty, so far as he can do so without serious danger to his own vessel, crew, and passengers (if any), to render persons affected by the collision, accident, or other casualty such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in order to minimize any danger caused by the collision, accident, or other casualty, and also give his name, address, and identification of his vessel in writing to any person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, accident, or other casualty. Any person who complies with this subsection or who gratuitously and in good faith renders assistance at the scene of a vessel collision, accident, or other casualty without objection of any person assisted, shall not be held liable for any civil damages as a result of the rendering of assistance or for any act or omission in providing or arranging salvage, towage, medical treatment or other assistance where the assisting person acts as an ordinary, reasonably prudent person would have acted under the same or similar circumstances.

In case of collision, accident, or other casualty involving a vessel, the operator of the vessel, if the collision, accident, or other casualty is of such a nature as to be reportable pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board, shall notify within a reasonable time a law-enforcement officer of the Commonwealth, conservation police officer, or Marine Resources Commission inspector.The operator shall file with the Department a full report of the collision, accident, or other casualty, as the regulations of the Board may require. The report shall be without prejudice, shall be for the information of the Department only, and shall not be open to public inspection. The fact that such a report has been made shall be admissible in evidence solely to show compliance with this section and applicable regulations, but no such report nor any statement contained in the report shall be admissible as evidence for any other purpose in any trial.

Any officer investigating any collision, accident or other casualty shall have authority, in lieu of arresting any person charged with violating any of the provisions of this chapter, to issue a written summons to the person (stating name, address, boat number, offense charged, etc.) to appear in court as in §

46.2-936

.

History.

1960, c. 500, § 62-174.11; 1962, c. 626; 1968, c. 659, § 62.1-177; 1972, c. 412; 1973, c. 381; 1987, c. 488; 1991, c. 336; 2007, c. 87.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in subsection B.

§ 29.1-739.1.
Disregarding signal by law-enforcement officer to stop; attempts to elude; penalty.

Any person who, having received a visible or audible signal of a flashing light or siren from any conservation police officer or other law-enforcement officer to bring his motorboat or other vessel, or seaplane to a stop, fails to do so promptly shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

Any person who, having received a visible or audible signal of a flashing light or siren from any conservation police officer or other law-enforcement officer to bring his motorboat or other vessel, or seaplane to a stop, (i) operates or navigates such motorboat or other vessel, or seaplane in willful or wanton disregard of such signal so as to endanger the life of the law-enforcement officer or other persons or to interfere with the operation of a law-enforcement vessel, or (ii) increases his speed and attempts to escape or elude a law-enforcement officer shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1993, c. 243; 1994, c. 414; 2007, c. 87.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 and Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 87 substituted “conservation police officer” for “game warden” in subsections A and B.